Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 1. Powers and Duties of the Commission.

Collateral references. —

64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Utilities, §§ 231 — 235, 264 — 275.

73B C.J.S., Public Utilities, §§ 38 — 62.

Secs. 42.05.010 — 42.05.131.
Establishment of Public Utilities Commission. [Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970; § 24 ch 25 SLA 1999.]

Sec. 42.05.141.
General powers and duties of the commission.

The Regulatory Commission of Alaska may do all things necessary or proper to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers expressly granted or reasonably implied in this chapter, including

regulate every public utility engaged or proposing to engage in a utility business inside the state, except to the extent exempted by AS

42.05.711

;

investigate, upon complaint or upon its own motion, the rates, classifications, rules, regulations, practices, services, and facilities of a public utility and hold hearings on them;

make or require just, fair, and reasonable rates, classifications, regulations, practices, services, and facilities for a public utility;

prescribe the system of accounts and regulate the service and safety of operations of a public utility;

require a public utility to file reports and other information and data;

appear personally or by counsel and represent the interests and welfare of the state in all matters and proceedings involving a public utility pending before an officer, department, board, commission, or court of the state or of another state or the United States and to intervene in, protest, resist, or advocate the granting, denial, or modification of any petition, application, complaint, or other proceeding;

examine witnesses and offer evidence in any proceeding affecting the state and initiate or participate in judicial proceedings to the extent necessary to protect and promote the interests of the state.

The commission shall perform the duties assigned to it under AS

42.45.100

—

42.45.190

.

In the establishment of electric service rates under this chapter the commission shall promote the conservation of resources used in the generation of electric energy.

When considering whether the approval of a rate or a gas supply contract proposed by a utility to provide a reliable supply of gas for a reasonable price is in the public interest, the commission shall

recognize the public benefits of allowing a utility to negotiate different pricing mechanisms with different gas suppliers and to maintain a diversified portfolio of gas supply contracts to protect customers from the risks of inadequate supply or excessive cost that may arise from a single pricing mechanism; and

consider whether a utility could meet its responsibility to the public in a timely manner and without undue risk to the public if the commission fails to approve a rate or a gas supply contract proposed by the utility.

The commission may not designate a local exchange carrier or long distance telephone company as the carrier of last resort. In this subsection, “local exchange carrier” and “long distance telephone company” have the meanings given in AS

42.05.890

.

The commission may designate an eligible telecommunications carrier consistent with 47 U.S.C. 214(e).

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 1971; am § 43 ch 83 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 18 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 1995; am § 6 ch 16 SLA 2010; am § 4 ch 24 SLA 2019)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in subsection (a) “Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “Alaska Public Utilities Commission” in accordance with § 30(a), ch. 25, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For federal Telecommunications Act of 1996, see U.S.C. 251 et seq.

Administrative Code. —

For applicability, see 3 AAC 47, art. 1.

For regulatory cost charges for regulated public utilities and pipeline carriers, see 3 AAC 47, art. 2.

For regulatory cost charges for exempt utilities, see 3 AAC 47, art. 3.

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For cost-of-service study and rate design information for electric utilities, see 3 AAC 48, art. 3.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

For simplified rate filing procedures for electric cooperatives, see 3 AAC 48, art. 5.

For regulatory policy standards, see 3 AAC 50, art. 1.

For cogeneration and small power production, see 3 AAC 50, art. 2.

For criteria for the provision of telecommunications relay service for the deaf, hard of hearing, and speech impaired, see 3 AAC 51, art. 1.

For gas utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 1.

For allocation of facilities and services between competing electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 2.

For telephone utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 3.

For criteria for intrastate interexchange telephone competition, see 3 AAC 52, art. 4.

For electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 5.

For adjustment clause, see 3 AAC 52, art. 6.

For criteria for determination of power cost equalization, see 3 AAC 52, art. 7.

For water and wastewater utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 8.

For simplified rate filing and jurisdictional cost allocation factor adjustment procedures for local exchange carrier, see 3 AAC 53, art. 1.

For procedures for changing an authorized telecommunications carrier, see 3 AAC 53, art. 3.

For local exchange competition, see 3 AAC 53, art. 4.

For universal service fund, see 3 AAC 53, art. 5.

For criteria for the provision of pay-per-call telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 6.

For criteria for the provision of statewide directory assistance, see 3 AAC 53, art. 7.

For state telecommunications modernization plan, see 3 AAC 53, art. 8.

For public interest pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 9.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

For regulation of cable television, see 3 AAC 53, art. 11.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective November 27, 2019, added (e) and (f).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Where public utility company entered into contract to sell natural gas to federal military installations pursuant to federal statute governing such contract negotiations, Alaska Public Utility Commission was precluded by supremacy clause of U.S. Constitution (Art.
VI, cl. 2) from asserting its jurisdiction over the sale. August 4, 1976, Op. Att’y Gen.

The Alaska Public Utility Commission can require that a public utility file copies of its military supply contracts with the Commission pursuant to AS

42.05.361(a)

.
August 4, 1976, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 42.05.145.
Telecommunications regulation policy; restriction on regulation of telephone directories.

A utility that provides local exchange or interexchange telecommunications service in the state affects the public interest. Regulation of these utilities shall, consistent with this chapter, seek to maintain and further the efficiency, availability, and affordability of universal basic telecommunications service.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the commission may not regulate the production and distribution of telephone directories.

History.

(§ 1 ch 43 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For telephone utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 3.

For criteria for intrastate interexchange telephone competition, see 3 AAC 52, art. 4.

For local exchange competition, see 3 AAC 53, art. 4.

For universal service fund, see 3 AAC 53, art. 5.

For criteria for the provision of pay-per-call telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 6.

For criteria for the provision of statewide directory assistance, see 3 AAC 53, art. 7.

For state telecommunications modernization plan, see 3 AAC 53, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 6, 2014, added (b).

Sec. 42.05.150.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.151.
Regulations and hearing procedures.

The commission may adopt regulations, not inconsistent with the law, necessary or proper to exercise its powers and to perform its duties under this chapter.

The commission shall adopt regulations governing practice and procedure, consistent with due process of law, including the conduct of formal and informal investigations, pre-hearing conferences, hearings, and proceedings, and the handling of procedural motions by a single commissioner. The regulations must provide for the hearing or, when a hearing is not required, other consideration of a matter in accordance with AS

42.04.080

. Technical rules of evidence need not apply to investigations, pre-hearing conferences, hearings, and proceedings before the commission. The commission shall provide for representation by out-of-state attorneys substantially in accordance with Rule 81, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

The commission, each commissioner, or an employee authorized by the commission may administer oaths, certify to all official acts, and issue subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum, and other process to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of testimony, records, papers, accounts, and documents in an inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding before the commission in any part of the state. Each commissioner is authorized to issue orders on procedural motions. The commission may petition a court of this state to enforce its subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum, or other process.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 25 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For applicability, see 3 AAC 47, art. 1.

For regulatory cost charges for regulated public utilities and pipeline carriers, see 3 AAC 47, art. 2.

For regulatory cost charges for exempt utilities, see 3 AAC 47, art. 3.

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For cost-of-service study and rate design information for electric utilities, see 3 AAC 48, art. 3.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

For simplified rate filing procedures for electric cooperatives, see 3 AAC 48, art. 5.

For deregulation ballot: election procedure, see 3 AAC 49, art. 1.

For regulatory policy standards, see 3 AAC 50, art. 1.

For cogeneration and small power production, see 3 AAC 50, art. 2.

For criteria for the provision of telecommunications relay service for the deaf, hard of hearing, and speech impaired, see 3 AAC 51, art. 1.

For gas utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 1.

For allocation of facilities and services between competing electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 2.

For telephone utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 3.

For criteria for intrastate interexchange telephone competition, see 3 AAC 52, art. 4.

For electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 5.

For adjustment clause, see 3 AAC 52, art. 6.

For criteria for determination of power cost equalization, see 3 AAC 52, art. 7.

For water and wastewater utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 8.

For joint use of utility facilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 9.

For simplified rate filing and jurisdictional cost allocation factor adjustment procedures for local exchange carriers, see 3 AAC 53, art. 1.

For procedures for changing an authorized telecommunications carrier, see 3 AAC 53, art. 3.

For local exchange competition, see 3 AAC 53, art. 4.

For universal service fund, see 3 AAC 53, art. 5.

For criteria for the provision of pay-per-call telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 6.

For criteria for the provision of statewide directory assistance, see 3 AAC 53, art. 7.

For state telecommunications modernization plan, see 3 AAC 53, art. 8.

For public interest pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 9.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

For regulation of cable television, see 3 AAC 53, art. 11.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Alaska Public Utilities Commission has the authority to promulgate standards for defining costs under the power cost equalization program (AS

44.83.162

— 44.83.165), [now AS

42.45.100

—

42.45.190

] and standards for generation efficiency.
The commission is empowered to adopt these standards as regulations under this section, as long as the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act are followed. May 16, 1988, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 42.05.160.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.161.
Application of Administrative Procedure Act.

The administrative adjudication procedures of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) do not apply to adjudicatory proceedings of the commission except that final administrative determinations by the commission are subject to judicial review under that Act as provided in AS

42.05.551(a)

.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to regulations adopted by the commission.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Sec. 42.05.170.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.171.
Formal hearings.

A formal hearing that the commission has power to hold may be held by or before a hearing panel appointed under AS

42.04.080

, a hearing examiner, or an administrative law judge designated for the purpose by the chair of the commission. In appropriate cases, a formal hearing may be held before an arbitrator or mediator designated for the purpose by the commission. The testimony and evidence in a formal hearing may be taken by the panel, by the hearing examiner, by the arbitrator, by the mediator, or by the administrative law judge to whom the hearing has been assigned. A decision of a hearing examiner, an arbitrator, a mediator, or an administrative law judge is not final until approved by the commission. A commissioner who has not heard or read the testimony, including the argument, may not participate in making a decision of a hearing panel. A party may file a petition for reconsideration of, or an administrative appeal of, a decision by a hearing examiner, an arbitrator, a mediator, or an administrative law judge that has been approved by the commission, or a decision of a hearing panel. The full commission shall act on the petition for reconsideration or the appeal. In determining the place of a hearing, the commission shall give preference to holding the hearing at a place most convenient for those interested in the subject of the hearing.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 45 ch 94 SLA 1980; am § 7 ch 110 SLA 1981; am § 7 ch 25 SLA 1999; am § 4 ch 5 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Sec. 42.05.175.
Timelines for issuance of final orders.

The commission shall issue a final order not later than 180 days after a complete application is filed for an application

for a certificate of public convenience and necessity;

to amend a certificate of public convenience and necessity;

to transfer a certificate of public convenience and necessity; and

to acquire a controlling interest in a certificated public utility.

Notwithstanding a suspension ordered under AS

42.05.421

, the commission shall issue a final order not later than 270 days after a complete tariff filing is made for a tariff filing that does not change the utility’s revenue requirement or rate design.

Notwithstanding a suspension ordered under AS

42.05.421

, the commission shall issue a final order not later than 450 days after a complete tariff filing is made for a tariff filing that changes the utility’s revenue requirement or rate design.

The commission shall issue a final order not later than 365 days after a complete formal complaint is filed against a utility or, when the commission initiates a formal investigation of a utility without the filing of a complete formal complaint, not later than 365 days after the order initiating the formal investigation is issued.

The commission shall issue a final order in a rule-making proceeding not later than 730 days after a complete petition for adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation under AS

44.62.180

—

44.62.290

is filed or, when the commission initiates a rule-making docket, not later than 730 days after the order initiating the proceeding is issued.

The commission may extend a timeline required under this section if all parties of record consent to the extension or if, for one time only, before the timeline expires, the

commission reasonably finds that good cause exists to extend the timeline;

commission issues a written order extending the timeline and setting out its findings regarding good cause; and

extension of time is 90 days or less.

The commission shall file quarterly reports with the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee identifying all extensions ordered under (f) of this section during the previous quarter and including copies of the written orders issued under (f)(2) of this section.

If the commission does not issue and serve a final order regarding an application or suspended tariff under section (a), (b), or (c) of this section within the applicable timeline specified, and if the commission does not extend the timeline in accordance with (f) of this section, the application or suspended tariff filing shall be considered approved and shall go into effect immediately.

In adjudicated docket matters that come before the commission under state law or federal law and are not subject to a timeline under federal law or (a) — (e) of this section, the commission shall issue a final order not later than 180 days after the filing of an initiating petition. If the matter is commenced on the commission’s own motion, the commission shall issue a final order not later than 365 days after the issuance of an order opening the docket. This subsection does not apply to a complaint against a utility, a petition to revoke a certificate of public convenience and necessity, or a functionally equivalent filing.

If the commission does not issue and serve a final order governed by (i) of this section within the applicable timeline specified, including any extension granted by the commission in accordance with (f) of this section, the initiating petition shall be considered approved and shall take effect immediately, or, if the matter was commenced by the commission, the docket shall be closed with no action taken.

If proceedings subject to different timelines under this section are consolidated or if a single proceeding implicates more than one timeline, the latest applicable deadline for the issuance of a final order shall apply.

The commission may not evade the requirement of this section by terminating a proceeding in a docket and opening a proceeding in another docket on substantially the same matter.

For purposes of this section, “final order” means a dispositive administrative order that resolves all matters at issue and that may be the basis for a petition for reconsideration or request for judicial review.

For purposes of this section, an application, tariff filing, formal complaint, or petition is complete if it complies with the filing, format, and content requirements established by statute, regulation, and forms adopted by the commission under regulation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 2 TSSLA 2002; am §§ 1 — 7 ch 36 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (i)-(

l

) were enacted as (k)-(n) and relettered in 2007, at which time (i) and (j) were relettered as (m) and (n), respectively, and an internal reference in subsection (j) was conformed.

Sec. 42.05.180.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.181.
Notice and hearing before final orders.

A final order of the commission compelling affirmative action, denying a right or privilege, or granting a right or privilege over protest of the public utility or any party of record may not be entered without giving the interested party reasonable notice and an opportunity to be heard.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Sec. 42.05.190.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.191.
Contents and service of orders.

Every formal order of the commission shall be based upon the facts of record. However, the commission may, without a hearing, issue an order approving any settlement supported by all the parties of record in a proceeding, including a compromise settlement. Every order entered pursuant to a hearing must state the commission’s findings, the basis of its findings and conclusions, together with its decision. These orders shall be entered of record and a copy of them shall be served on all parties of record in the proceeding.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 4 ch 2 TSSLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Secs. 42.05.193 — 42.05.196.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.200.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.201.
Publication of reports, orders, decisions, and regulations.

All reports, orders, decisions, and regulations of the commission shall be in writing.
The commission shall apprise all affected utilities and interested parties of these reports, orders, decisions, and regulations as they are issued and adopted, and, when appropriate to do so, shall publish them in a manner that will reasonably inform the public or the affected consumers of any public utility service.
The commission may set charges for costs of printing or reproducing and furnishing copies of its reports, orders, decisions and regulations.
The publication requirement, as it pertains to regulations, does not supersede the requirements of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Sec. 42.05.210.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.211.
Annual report.

The commission shall, by November 15 of each year, publish an annual report reviewing its activities during the previous fiscal year and notify the legislature that the report is available. The report must address the regulation of public utility service in the state as of June 30 and must contain details about the commission’s compliance with the requirements of AS

42.05.175(a)

— (e), with the timeline extensions made by the commission under AS

42.05.175(f)

, and with other performance measures established by the commission.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 80 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 2007)

Sec. 42.05.220.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]